California statutes. Family Code
 citation requiring the parent or alleged parent to appear at the time and place stated in the citation and (2) the citation shall be published pursuant to Section 6064 of the Government Code in a newspaper to be named and designated in the order as most likely to give notice to the parent or alleged parent to be served.

(c) In case of publication where the residence of a parent or alleged parent is known, the court shall also direct a copy of the citation to be forthwith served upon that parent or alleged parent by mail by deposit in the post office properly addressed and with the postage thereon fully prepaid, directed to that parent or alleged parent at the place of residence. When publication is ordered, service of a copy of the citation in the manner provided for in Section 7881 is equivalent to publication and deposit in the post office.

(d) If one or both of the parents of the child are unknown or if the names of one or both of the child’s parents are uncertain, that fact shall be set forth in the affidavit and the court shall order the citation to be directed to either or both of the child’s parents, naming and otherwise describing the child, and to all persons claiming to be a parent of the child.

(e) Service is complete at the expiration of the time prescribed by the order for publication or when service is made as provided for in Section 7881, whichever event first occurs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 115, Sec. 103.   (AB 1817)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

7883.

If a person personally served with a citation within this state as provided in Section 7880 fails without reasonable cause to appear and abide by the order of the court, or to bring the child before the court if so required in the citation, the failure constitutes a contempt of court.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

7884.

(a) Unless requested by the child concerning whom the petition has been filed and any parent or guardian present, the public shall not be admitted to a proceeding under this part.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the judge may admit those persons the judge determines have a direct and legitimate interest in the particular case or in the work of the court.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Hearing and Subsequent Proceedings [7890. - 7895.]

7890.

In a proceeding under this part, the court shall consider the wishes of the child, bearing in mind the age of the child, and shall act in the best interest of the child.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

7891.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in this section, if the child who is the subject of the petition is 10 years of age or older, the child shall be heard by the court in chambers on at least the following matters:

(1) The feelings and thoughts of the child concerning the custody proceeding about to take place.

(2) The feelings and thoughts of the child about the child’s parent or parents.

(3) The child’s preference as to custody, according to Section 3042.

(b) The court shall inform the child of the child’s right to attend the hearing. However, counsel for the child may waive the hearing in chambers by the court.

(c) This section does not apply if the child is confined because of illness or other incapacity to an institution or residence and is therefore unable to attend.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 219, Sec. 182.5.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

7892.

(a) The testimony of the child may be taken in chambers and outside the presence of the child’s parent or parents if the child’s parent or parents are represented by counsel, the counsel is present, and any of the following circumstances exist:

(1) The court determines that testimony in chambers is necessary to ensure truthful testimony.

(2) The child is likely to be intimidated by a formal courtroom setting.

(3) The child is afraid to testify in front of the child’s parent or parents.

(b) The testimony of a child also may be taken in chambers and outside the presence of the guardian or guardians of a child under the circumstances specified in subdivision (a).

(c) A finding pursuant to this section shall be supported by clear and convincing evidence.

(d) After testimony in chambers, the parent
 or parents of the child may elect to have the court reporter read back the testimony or have the testimony summarized by counsel for the parent or parents.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

7892.5.

The court shall not declare an Indian child free from the custody or control of a parent, unless both of the following apply:

(a) The court finds, supported by clear and convincing evidence, that active efforts were made in accordance with Section 361.7 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(b) The court finds, supported by evidence beyond a reasonable doubt, including testimony of one or more “qualified expert witnesses” as described in Section 224.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, that the continued custody of the child by the parent is likely to result in serious emotional or physical damage to the child.

(c) This section shall only apply to proceedings involving an Indian child.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 838, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

7893.

(a) If the court, by order or judgment, declares a child free from the custody and control of both parents under this part, or one parent if the other no longer has custody and control, the court shall at the same time take one of the following actions:

(1) Appoint a guardian for the child.

(2) At the request of the State Department of Social Services or a licensed adoption agency, or where the court finds it is in the child’s best interest, refer the child to a licensed adoption agency for adoptive placement by the agency.

(b) When the court refers the child to a licensed adoption agency for adoptive placement by the agency:

(1) The agency is responsible for the care of the child and is entitled to the exclusive custody and control of the child at all times until a petition for adoption has been granted.

(2) After the
 referral, no petition for guardianship may be filed without the consent of the agency.

(3) No petition for adoption may be heard until the appellate rights of the natural parents have been exhausted.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

7894.

(a) An order and judgment of the court declaring a child free from the custody and control of a parent or parents under this part is conclusive and binding upon the child, upon the parent or parents, and upon all other persons who have been served with citations by publication or otherwise as provided in this part.

(b) After making the order and judgment, the court has no power to set aside, change, or modify it.

(c) Nothing in this section limits the right to appeal from the order and judgment.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

7895.

(a) Upon appeal from a judgment freeing a child who is a dependent child of the juvenile court from parental custody and control, the appellate court shall appoint counsel for the appellant as provided by this section.

(b) Upon motion by the appellant and a finding that the appellant is unable to afford counsel, the appellate court shall appoint counsel for the indigent appellant, and appellant’s counsel shall be provided a free copy of the reporter’s and clerk’s transcript. All of those costs are a charge against the court.

(c) The reporter’s and clerk’s transcripts shall be prepared and transmitted immediately after filing of the notice of appeal, at court expense and without advance payment of fees. If the appellant is able to afford counsel, the court may seek reimbursement from the appellant for the cost of the transcripts under subdivision (c) of Section 68511.3 of the Government Code as though the
 appellant had been granted permission to proceed in forma pauperis.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 754, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 5. INTERSTATE COMPACT ON PLACEMENT OF CHILDREN [7900. - 7913.]

7900.

The Interstate Compact on Placement of Children as set forth in Section 7901 is hereby adopted and entered into with all other jurisdictions joining therein.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

7901.

The provisions of the interstate compact referred to in Section 7900 are as follows:
INTERSTATE COMPACT ON THE PLACEMENT OF CHILDREN
Article 1.Purpose and Policy
It is the purpose and policy of the party states to cooperate with each other in the interstate placement of children to the end that:

(a) Each child requiring placement shall receive the maximum opportunity to be placed in a suitable environment and with persons
 or institutions having appropriate qualifications and facilities to provide a necessary and desirable degree and type of care.

(b) The appropriate authorities in a state where a child is to be placed may have full opportunity to ascertain the circumstances of the proposed placement, thereby promoting full compliance with applicable requirements for the protection of the child.

(c) The proper authorities of the state from which the placement is made may obtain the most complete information on the basis on which to evaluate a projected placement before it is made.

(d) Appropriate jurisdictional arrangements for the care of children will be promoted.
Article 2.Definitions
As used in this compact:

(a) “Child” means a person who, by reason of minority, is legally subject to parental, guardianship, or similar control.

(b) “Sending agency” means a party state, or officer or employee thereof; subdivision of a party state, or officer or employee thereof; a court of a party state; a person, corporation, association, charitable agency, or other entity that sends, brings, or causes to be sent or brought any child to another party state.

(c) “Receiving state” means the state to which a child is sent, brought, or caused to
 be sent or brought, whether by public authorities or private persons or agencies, and whether for placement with state or local public authorities or for placement with private agencies or persons.

(d) “Placement” means the arrangement for the care of a child in a family free or boarding home or in a child-caring agency or institution, but does not include any institution caring for persons with developmental disabilities or mental health disorders or any institution primarily educational in character, and any hospital or other medical facility.
Article 3.Conditions for Placement
(a) A sending agency shall not send, bring, or
 cause to be sent or brought into any other party state any child for placement in foster care or as a preliminary to a possible adoption unless the sending agency complies with each and every requirement set forth in this article and with the applicable laws of the receiving state governing the placement of children therein.

(b) Before sending, bringing, or causing any child to be sent or brought into a receiving state for placement in foster care or as a preliminary to a possible adoption, the sending agency shall furnish the appropriate public authorities in the receiving state written notice of the intention to send, bring, or place the child in the receiving state. The notice shall contain:

(1) The name, date, and place of birth of the child.

(2) The identity and address or addresses of the parents or legal guardian.

(3) The name and address of the person, agency, or institution to or with which the sending agency proposes to send, bring, or place the child.

(4) A full statement of the reasons for the proposed action and evidence of the authority pursuant to which the placement is proposed to be made.

(c) Any public officer or agency in a receiving state that receives notice pursuant to paragraph (b) of this article may request of the sending agency, or any other appropriate officer or agency of or in the sending agency’s state, and shall be entitled to receive therefrom, supporting or
 additional information it deems necessary under the circumstances to carry out the purpose and policy of this compact.

(d) The child shall not be sent, brought, or caused to be sent or brought into the receiving state until the appropriate public authorities in the receiving state notify the sending agency, in writing, to the effect that the proposed placement does not appear to be contrary to the interest of the child.
Article 4.Penalty for Illegal Placement
The sending, bringing, or causing to be sent or brought into any receiving state of a child in violation of the terms of this compact shall constitute a violation of the laws respecting the
 placement of children of both the state in which the sending agency is located or from which it sends or brings the child and of the receiving state. A violation may be punished or subjected to penalty in either jurisdiction in accordance with its laws. In addition to liability for any punishment or penalty, any violation shall constitute full and sufficient grounds for the suspension or revocation of any license, permit, or other legal authorization held by the sending agency
 that empowers or allows it to place or care for children.
Article 5.Continuing Jurisdiction
(a) The sending agency shall retain jurisdiction over the child sufficient to determine all matters in relation to the custody, supervision, care, treatment, and disposition of the child that it would have had if the child had remained in the sending agency’s state, until the child is adopted, reaches majority, becomes self-supporting, or is discharged with the concurrence of the appropriate authority in the receiving state. That jurisdiction shall also include the power to effect or cause the return of the child or the child’s transfer to another location and custody pursuant to law.
 The sending agency shall continue to have financial responsibility for support and maintenance of the child during the period of the placement. Nothing contained herein shall defeat a claim of jurisdiction by a receiving state sufficient to deal with an act of delinquency or crime committed therein.

(b) When the sending agency is a public agency, it may enter into an agreement with an authorized public or private agency in the receiving state providing for the performance of one or more services in respect of that case by the latter as agent for the sending agency.

(c) This compact shall not be construed to prevent a private charitable agency authorized to place children in the receiving state from performing services or acting as agent in that state for a private charitable agency
 of the sending state or to prevent the agency in the receiving state from discharging financial responsibility for the support and maintenance of a child who has been placed on behalf of the sending agency without relieving the responsibility set forth in paragraph (a) of this article.
Article 6.Institutional Care of Delinquent Children
A child adjudicated delinquent may be placed in an institution in another party jurisdiction pursuant to this compact but that placement shall not be made unless the child is given a court hearing on notice to the parent or guardian with opportunity to be heard, before being sent to the other party jurisdiction for institutional care and the court finds that both of the following exist:

(a) Equivalent facilities for the child are not available in the sending agency’s jurisdiction.

(b) Institutional care in the other jurisdiction is in the best interest of the child and will not produce undue hardship.
Article 7.Compact Administrator
The executive head of each jurisdiction party to this compact shall designate an officer who shall be general coordinator of activities under this compact in that jurisdiction and who, acting jointly with like officers of other party jurisdictions, shall have power to promulgate rules and regulations to carry out more effectively the terms
 and provisions of this compact.
Article 8.Limitations
This compact shall not apply to:

(a) The sending or bringing of a child into a receiving state by the child’s parent, stepparent, grandparent, adult brother or sister, adult uncle or aunt, or the child’s guardian and leaving the child with any such relative or nonagency guardian in the receiving state.

(b) Any placement, sending, or bringing of a child into a receiving state pursuant to any other interstate compact to which both the state from which the child is sent or brought and the receiving state are party, or to any other agreement
 between those states that has the force of law.
Article 9.Enactment and Withdrawal
This compact shall be open to joinder by any state, territory, or possession of the United States, the District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, and, with the consent of Congress, the government of Canada or any province thereof. It shall become effective with respect to any of these jurisdictions when that jurisdiction has enacted the same into law. Withdrawal from this compact shall be by the enactment of a statute repealing the same, but shall not take effect until two years after the effective date of the statute and until written notice of the withdrawal has been given by the withdrawing state to the Governor
 of each other party jurisdiction. Withdrawal of a party state shall not affect the rights, duties, and obligations under this compact of any sending agency therein with respect to a placement made before the effective date of withdrawal.
Article 10.Construction and Severability
The provisions of this compact shall be liberally construed to effectuate the purposes thereof. The provisions of this compact shall be severable and if any phrase, clause, sentence, or provision of this compact is declared to be contrary to the constitution of any party state or of the United States or the applicability thereof to any government, agency, person, or circumstance is held invalid, the validity of the remainder of this
 compact and the applicability thereof to any government, agency, person, or circumstance shall not be affected thereby. If this compact shall be held contrary to the constitution of any state party thereto, the compact shall remain in full force and effect as to the remaining states and in full force and effect as to the state affected as to all severable matters.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 115, Sec. 104.   (AB 1817)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

7901.1.

(a) Within 60 days of receipt of a request from another state to conduct a study of a home environment for purposes of assessing the safety and suitability of placing a child in the home, a county child welfare agency shall, directly or by contract, do both of the following:

(1) Conduct and complete the study.

(2) Return a report to the requesting state on the results of the study. The report shall address the extent
 to which placement in the home would meet the needs of the child.

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (c), in the case of a home study commenced on or before September 30, 2008, if the agency fails to comply with subdivision (a) within the 60-day period as a result of circumstances beyond the control of the agency, the agency shall have 75 days to comply with subdivision (a). The agency shall document the circumstances involved and certify that completing the home study is in the best interests of the child. For purposes of this subdivision, “circumstances beyond the control of the agency” include, but are not limited to, the failure of a federal agency to provide the results of a background check or the failure of any entity to provide completed medical forms, if the background check or records were requested by the agency at least 45 days before the end of the 60-day period.

(c) Subdivision (b) shall not be construed to require the agency to have completed, within the applicable period, the parts of the home study involving the education and training of the prospective foster or adoptive parents.

(d) The agency shall treat any report described in subdivision (a) that is received from another state, an Indian tribe, or a private agency under contract with another state, as meeting any requirements imposed by the state for the completion of a home study before placing a child in the home, unless, within 14 days after receipt of the report, the agency determines, based on grounds that are specific to the content of the report, that making a decision in reliance on the report would be contrary to the welfare of the child.

(e) A county is not restricted from contracting with a private agency for the conduct of a home study described in
 subdivision (a).

(f) The department shall work with counties to identify barriers to meeting the timeframes specified in this section and to develop recommendations to reduce or eliminate those barriers.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 583, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

7902.

Financial responsibility for a child placed pursuant to the Interstate Compact on the Placement of Children shall be determined in accordance with Article 5 of the compact in the first instance. However, in the event of partial or complete default of performance thereunder, the provisions of other state laws also may be invoked.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

7903.

The phrase “appropriate public authorities” as used in Article 3 of the Interstate Compact on the Placement of Children means, with reference to this state, the State Department of Social Services, and that department shall receive and act with reference to notices required by Article 3 of the compact.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

7904.

The phrase “appropriate authority in receiving state” as used in paragraph (a) of Article 5 of the Interstate Compact on the Placement of Children, with reference to this state, means the State Department of Social Services.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

7905.

The officers and agencies of this state and its subdivisions having authority to place children are hereby empowered to enter into agreements with appropriate officers or agencies of or in other party states pursuant to paragraph (b) of Article 5 of the Interstate Compact on the Placement of Children. Any such agreement which contains a financial commitment or imposes a financial obligation on this state or subdivision or agency thereof is not binding unless it has the approval in writing of the Controller in the case of the state and of the chief local fiscal
 officer in the case of a subdivision of the state.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

7906.

Any requirements for visitation, inspection, or supervision of children, homes, institutions, or other agencies in another party state which may apply under the law of this state shall be deemed to be met if performed pursuant to an agreement entered into by appropriate officers or agencies of this state or a subdivision thereof as contemplated by paragraph (b) of Article 5 of the Interstate Compact on the Placement of Children.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

7906.5.

(a) Within 60 days after an officer or agency of this state, or its political subdivision, receives a request from another state to conduct a study of a home environment for purposes of assessing the safety and suitability of placing a child, who is in the custody of the requesting state, in the home, the county child welfare agency shall, directly or indirectly, do both of the following:

(1) Conduct and complete the home study.

(2) Return to the requesting state a report on the results of the home study, which shall address the extent to which placement in the home would meet the needs of the child.

(b) A licensed private adoption agency may agree to provide the services listed in subdivision (a), and upon that agreement, shall comply with the requirements of paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (a).

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), in the case of a home study commenced on or before September 30, 2008, if the county fails to comply with subdivision (a) within the 60-day period as a result of circumstances beyond the control of the state, including, but not limited to, failure by a federal agency to provide the results of a background check or failure of any entity to provide completed medical forms requested by the state at least 45 days before the end of the 60-day period, the county
 shall have 75 days to comply with subdivision (a) if the county documents the circumstances involved and certifies that completing the home study is in the best interest of the child.

(d) Nothing in this section shall be construed to require the county to have completed, within the applicable period, those portions of the home study concerning the education and training of the prospective foster parent or adoptive parent.

(e) The county shall treat any report described in subdivision (a) that is received from another state, an Indian tribe, or a private agency under contract with another state, as meeting any requirements imposed by the state for the completion of a home study before placing a child in the home, unless, within 14 days after receipt of the report, the county determines, based on grounds that are specific to the content of the report, that making a decision in
 reliance on the report would be contrary to the welfare of the child.

(f) A county is not restricted from contracting with a private agency for the conduct of a home study described in subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 583, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

7907.

No provision of law restricting out-of-state placement of children for adoption shall apply to placements made pursuant to the Interstate Compact on the Placement of Children.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

7907.3.

The Interstate Compact on the Placement of Children shall not apply to any placement, sending, or bringing of an Indian child into another state pursuant to a transfer of jurisdiction to a tribal court under Section 1911 of the Indian Child Welfare Act (25 U.S.C. Sec. 1901 et seq.).

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 838, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

7907.5.

(a) A child who is born in this state and placed for adoption in this state with a resident of this state is not subject to the provisions of the Interstate Compact on the Placement of Children.

(b) A child who is born in this state and placed for adoption with a person who is not a resident of this state is subject to the provisions of the Interstate Compact on the Placement of Children, regardless of whether the adoption petition is filed in this state. In interstate placements,
 this state shall be deemed the sending state for any child born in the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 858, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

7908.

A court having jurisdiction to place children adjudged wards of the court may place a ward in an out-of-state facility, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 7910, pursuant to
 Section 727.1 of the Welfare and Institutions Code and Article 6 of the Interstate Compact on the Placement of Children and shall retain jurisdiction as provided in Article 5 of the compact.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 86, Sec. 3.   (AB 153)   Effective July 16, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

7908.5.

For the purposes of an interstate adoption placement, the term “jurisdiction” as used in Article 5 of the Interstate Compact on the Placement of Children means “jurisdiction over or legal responsibility for the child.” It is the intent of the Legislature that this section make a technical clarification to the Interstate Compact on the Placement of Children and not a substantive change.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 260, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

7909.

“Executive head” as used in Article 7 of the Interstate Compact on the Placement of Children means the Governor. The Governor shall appoint a compact administrator in accordance with the terms of Article 7 of the compact.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

7910.

(a) Approval of an interstate placement of a child for adoption shall not be granted by the Compact Administrator if the placement is in violation of either Section 8801 of this code or Section 273 of the Penal Code.

(b) (1) The Compact Administrator shall not submit to a receiving state a request to
 place a dependent or ward for whom a county child welfare agency or county probation department has placement and care responsibility in an out-of-state residential facility, unless the requirements of Section 7911.1 of this code and Section 361.21 of, or subdivision (b) of Section 727.1 of, the Welfare and Institutions Code are met.

(2) For the purpose of this section, an “out-of-state residential facility” is a facility that is located in a state outside of California, is licensed or otherwise approved by the applicable state or tribal authority, and provides an integrated program of specialized and intensive care and supervision, services and supports, treatment, and short-term, 24-hour, trauma-informed care and supervision to children. An out-of-state residential facility may be called another name, including a group home, a
 residential treatment facility, or a residential care treatment facility.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 86, Sec. 4.   (AB 153)   Effective July 16, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

7911.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) The health and safety of California children placed by a county child welfare agency or probation department out of state pursuant to the provisions of the Interstate Compact on the Placement of Children are a matter of statewide concern.

(2) The State Department of Social Services has full authority to require any placement of a child in an out-of-state residential facility by a county child welfare agency or county probation department be approved on a child-specific basis after the county has exhausted in-state placement and services options that meet the needs of the child and participated in the department’s
 technical assistance program. Before the juvenile court approves the placement pursuant to Section 361.21 of, or subdivision (b) of Section 727.1 of, the Welfare and Institutions Code, the State Department of Social Services shall certify the out-of-state residential facility pursuant to Section 7911.1. Before processing an application for out-of-state placement in a residential facility pursuant to the Interstate Compact on the Placement of Children, the Compact Administrator shall verify that the placement was approved by the juvenile court and that it has been certified by the department.

(3) The Legislature further finds and declares that certification of facilities licensed under a separate state’s licensing standards has not been sufficient to ensure that the stringent California short-term residential therapeutic programs requirements are maintained to safeguard the health, safety, and well-being of California’s foster children and
 youth. Further research demonstrates that dependents and wards in foster care placements are generally better served when they are able to maintain and develop local community supports closer to their families and communities.

(b) (1) On and after July 1, 2021, foster care placements by county child welfare agencies or probation departments into out-of-state residential facilities shall not be made, except in the limited circumstances authorized by Section 361.21 of, or subdivision (b) of Section 727.1 of, the Welfare and Institutions Code, as applicable. Unless placement of a child in an out-of-state residential facility does not require certification pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 7911.1, the Compact Administrator shall not seek approval of placement in an out-of-state residential facility from the receiving state unless all of the following criteria are met:

(A) The Compact Administrator has received from the county placing agency documentation that it has complied with the requirements of Section 16010.9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(B) The Compact Administrator has received documentation that the out-of-state residential facility has been certified by the State Department of Social Services, including documentation that the director of the State Department of Social Services has approved the certification.

(C) The Compact Administrator has received a copy of the juvenile court order authorizing placement of the child in the out-of-state residential facility pursuant to Section 361.21 or 727.1 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(2) On and after July 1, 2022, county child welfare agencies or probation departments shall not make new placements in
 out-of-state residential facilities, except for placements described in subdivision (h) of Section 7911.1.

(c) Notwithstanding any other law, on and after July 1, 2022, the State Department of Social Services shall not certify any new out-of-state residential facilities for placement by county child welfare agencies or probation departments. On and after July 1, 2022, the Compact Administrator shall not seek approval of any new placements by county child welfare agencies or probation departments in out-of-state residential facilities.

(d) The state shall decertify all out-of-state residential facilities for placement by county child welfare agencies or probation departments on January 1, 2023, and ensure that all children and youth placed in out of state residential facilities have been returned to California by that date.

(e) This section is declaratory of existing law with respect to the Governor’s designation of the State Department of Social Services to act as the Compact Administrator and of that department to act as the single state agency charged with supervision of public social services under Section 10600 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 86, Sec. 6.   (AB 153)   Effective July 16, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

7911.1.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, the State Department of Social Services or its designee shall investigate any threat to the health and safety of children placed by a California county child welfare agency or probation department in an out-of-state residential facility, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 7910, pursuant to the provisions of the Interstate Compact on the Placement of Children. This authority shall include the authority to interview children or staff in private or review their file at the out-of-state residential facility or wherever the child or files may be at the time of the investigation. Notwithstanding any other law, the State Department of Social Services or its designee shall require certified out-of-state residential facilities to comply with the reporting requirements
 applicable to short-term residential therapeutic programs licensed in California for each child in care, regardless of whether or not the child is a California placement, by submitting a copy of the required reports to the Compact Administrator within regulatory timeframes. The Compact Administrator, within one business day of receiving a serious incident report from a certified out-of-state residential facility, shall verbally notify any county child welfare agency or probation department with a child placed at the certified out-of-state residential facility of the serious incident report. The Compact Administrator, within five business days of receiving a written serious incident report from a certified out-of-state residential facility, shall forward a copy of the written serious incident report to any county child welfare agency or probation department with a child placed at the certified out-of-state residential facility.

(b) Any contract,
 memorandum of understanding, or agreement entered into pursuant to paragraph (b) of Article 5 of the Interstate Compact on the Placement of Children regarding the placement of a child out of state by a California county social services agency or probation department shall include the language set forth in subdivision (a).

(c) Upon receipt of a request from a county child welfare agency or probation department for a child-specific certification of a placement in an out-of-state residential facility, the State Department of Social Services or its designee shall expedite the review of the request in order to determine any additional information needed, shall communicate with the requesting county agency regarding its review including regular status updates, and shall, in a timely manner, determine whether it will issue a child-specific certification to the out-of-state residential facility pursuant to this section.

(1) The licensing standards applicable to an out-of-state residential facility certified by the department shall be those required of short-term residential therapeutic programs operated in this state.

(2) Before issuing a child-specific certification to the out-of-state residential facility, the department shall do all of the following:

(A) Review documentation provided by the county placing agency pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 16010.9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(B) Perform an on-site inspection of the out-of-state residential facility’s physical site.

(C) At a minimum, review all of the following sections of the out-of-state residential facility’s program statement:

(i) Core Services and Supports.

(ii) Trauma Informed Interventions and Treatment Practices.

(iii) Personal Rights.

(iv) House Rules.

(v) Discipline Policies and Procedures.

(vi) Emergency Intervention Plan (Including Runaway Plan).

(D) Review the out-of-state residential facility’s serious incident reports.

(E) Review the out-of-state residential facility’s current license. In order for the out-of-state residential facility to receive a certification, the out-of-state residential facility shall have a
 current license, or an equivalent approval, in good standing issued by the appropriate authority or authorities of the state in which it is operating.

(F) Review the out-of-state residential facility’s licensing history, including any substantiated complaints.
